Massachusetts, session 194th, H1581.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 94C of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 49 the following section:- 
Section 50. (a) Definitions. The following definitions apply to this section 50. 
(1) "Real-time stop sale system" means a system intended to be used by law enforcement 
agencies and pharmacies or other business establishments that: 
(A) is installed, operated, and maintained free of any one-time or recurring charge to the 
business establishment or to the state; 
(B) is able to communicate in real time with similar systems operated in other states and 
similar systems containing information submitted by more than one state; 

of 4 10  (C) complies with the security policy of the Criminal Justice Information Services 
division of the Federal Bureau of Investigation; 
(D) complies with information exchange standards adopted by the National Information 
Exchange Model; 
(E) uses a mechanism to prevent the completion of a sale of a product containing 
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or norpseudoephedrine that would violate state or federal law 
regarding the purchase of a product containing those substances; and 
(F) is equipped with an override of the mechanism that: 
(i) may be activated by an employee of a business establishment; and 
(ii) creates a record of each activation of the override. 
(b)(1) A retailer shall not sell to the same person, and a person shall not purchase, 
products containing more than three and six tenths (3.6) grams per day or more than nine (9) 
grams per thirty day period of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine base, or their isomers. The limits 
shall apply to the total amount of base ephedrine and pseudoephedrine contained in the products, 
and not the overall weight of the products. 
(2) Nonprescription products containing pseudoephedrine or ephedrine shall be 
maintained behind the counter or in a locked case where the customer does not have direct 
access. 
(c) The retailer shall require any person purchasing a nonprescription product that 
contains pseudoephedrine or ephedrine to present valid government issued photo identification at 
the point of sale. The retailer shall record the name and address of the purchaser; name and 

of 4 31 quantity of product purchased; date and time purchased; and purchaser identification type and 
number, such as driver license state and number, and require the purchaser’s signature in a 
logbook. 
(d) Beginning January 1, 2026, a retailer shall, before completing a sale under this 
section, electronically submit the required information to the real-time stop sale system 
administered by the department of public health or such other appropriate state agency; provided 
that the system is available without a charge to retailers for access. Absent negligence, 
wantonness, recklessness, or deliberate misconduct, any retailer utilizing the electronic sales 
tracking system in accordance with this subdivision shall not be civilly liable as a result of any 
act or omission in carrying out the duties required by this subsection and shall be immune from 
liability to any third party unless the retailer has violated any provision of this subsection in 
relation to a claim brought for such violation. 
(e) If a retailer selling a nonprescription product containing pseudoephedrine or 
ephedrine experiences mechanical or electronic failure of the electronic sales tracking system 
and is unable to comply with the electronic sales tracking requirement, the retailer shall maintain 
a written log or an alternative electronic recordkeeping mechanism until such time as the retailer 
is able to comply with the electronic sales tracking requirement. 
(f) The vendor of the real time stop sale system shall forward state transaction records in 
the real-time stop sale system to the appropriate state agency weekly, and provide real-time 
access to the real-time stop sale system information through the system’s online portal to law 
enforcement in the state as authorized by the agency. 

of 4 52  (g) This system shall be capable of generating a stop sale alert, which shall be a 
notification that completion of the sale would result in the seller or purchaser violating the 
quantity limits set forth in this section. The seller shall not complete the sale if the system 
generates a stop sale alert. The system shall contain an override function that may be used by a 
dispenser of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine who has a reasonable fear of imminent bodily harm if 
they do not complete a sale. Each instance in which the override function is utilized shall be 
logged by the system. 
(h) A violation of any provision of this section is a misdemeanor, punishable by fine 
only, not to exceed $1,000 for a first violation of this section, and not to exceed $5,000 for any 
subsequent violation. If a product is dispensed in violation of subsection (a), the owner or 
operator of the wholesale or retail establishment dispensing the product shall be in violation of 
subsection (a). 
(i) This section does not apply to a person who obtains the product pursuant to a valid 
prescription. 
(j) This section shall preempt and supersede any local laws or ordinances regulating sales 
of products containing pseudoephedrine or ephedrine.